Hawaii statutes.
§449‑8 Issuance and renewal of
license. After approval of the application, and payment of the license
fee, the commissioner shall issue to the applicant a license to act as an
escrow depository. The license shall be effective only upon the applicant's filing
with the commissioner an escrow depository's bond and evidence that fidelity
bonds and errors and omissions insurance, or cash or securities deposits
permitted in lieu thereof, have been obtained, all as provided in sections 449‑9,
449‑11, and 449‑12. The license shall be renewed annually, as of
December 31, upon payment of the annual renewal fee and the finding of the
commissioner, from the information contained in the annual corporate exhibit of
the licensee or investigation or hearing, that the licensee continues to meet
the qualifications for licensing and has continued in force the bonds and
insurance or the cash or securities deposits permitted in lieu thereof. [L
1967, c 144, pt of §1; HRS §449-8; am L 1970, c 72, §1; am L 1985, c 269, §50;
am L 1992, c 205, §9; am L 2016, c 224, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next